el: Ετοιμότητα συστήματος επικοινωνίας κράνους: Υποδοχή επικοινωνίας για συγκεκριμένη μάρκα/μοντέλο; Περιλαμβάνεται σύστημα επικοινωνίας; Χωρίς υποδοχή επικοινωνίας; Υποδοχή επικοινωνίας γενικής χρήσης (εγκοπές ηχείων); Άλλο
tr: Kask iletişim sistemi uyumluluğu: Marka/modele özel iletişim sistemine hazır; İletişim sistemi dahil; İletişim sistemine hazır değil; Evrensel iletişim sistemine hazır (hoparlör yuvaları); Diğer
fr: Prédisposition du casque pour système de communication: Prêt pour communication spécifique à la marque/au modèle; Système de communication inclus; Non prêt pour communication; Prêt pour communication universelle (découpes pour haut-parleurs); Autre
it: Stato di preparazione del sistema di comunicazione integrato nel casco: Predisposto per sistema di comunicazione di marca/modello specifici; Sistema di comunicazione incluso; Non predisposto per sistema di comunicazione; Predisposto per sistema di comunicazione universale (fori per altoparlanti); Altro
sk-SK: Pripravenosť komunikačného systému v prilbe: Pripravené na komunikáciu špecifickú pre značku/model; Komunikačný systém v balení; Nepripravené na komunikačný systém; Univerzálna príprava na komunikáciu (výrezy na reproduktory); Iné
th: ความพร้อมของระบบสื่อสารในหมวกกันน็อค: รองรับการสื่อสารเฉพาะแบรนด์/รุ่น; รวมระบบสื่อสาร; ไม่รองรับการสื่อสาร; รองรับการสื่อสารแบบสากล (มีช่องเว้าสำหรับลำโพง); อื่นๆ
pl: Gotowość kasku do systemu komunikacji: Przystosowany do komunikacji (dla konkretnej marki/modelu); System komunikacji w zestawie; Nieprzystosowany do komunikacji; Uniwersalnie przystosowany do komunikacji (wycięcia na głośniki); Inne
bg-BG: Подготовка за комуникационна система на каската: Подготовка за комуникация, специфична за марка/модел; Включена комуникационна система; Без подготовка за комуникация; Универсална подготовка за комуникация (изрези за високоговорители); Други
en: Helmet communication system readiness: Brand/model-specific communication-ready; Communication system included; Not communication-ready; Universal communication-ready (speaker cutouts); Other
nb: Beredskap for hjelmkommunikasjonssystem: Klargjort for merke-/modellspesifikk kommunikasjon; Kommunikasjonssystem inkludert; Ikke klargjort for kommunikasjon; Klargjort for universell kommunikasjon (høyttalerutskjæringer); Annet
ro-RO: Pregătire sistem de comunicare cu cască: Pregătit pentru sistem de comunicare specific mărcii/modelului; Sistem de comunicare inclus; Nu este pregătit pentru sistem de comunicare; Pregătit pentru sistem de comunicare universal (decupaje pentru difuzor); Altele
hr-HR: Spremnost komunikacijskog sustava kacige: Spremno za komunikaciju (specifično za marku/model); Komunikacijski sustav uključen; Nije spremno za komunikaciju; Univerzalno spremno za komunikaciju (izrezi za zvučnike); Ostalo
hu: A sisakba épített kommunikációs rendszer üzemkészsége: Márka-/modellspecifikus kommunikáció-előkészítés; Kommunikációs rendszert tartalmaz; Nincs kommunikáció-előkészítés; Univerzális kommunikáció-előkészítés (hangszórókivágások); Egyéb
ko: 헬멧 통신 시스템 준비 상태: 브랜드/모델 전용 통신 준비 완료; 통신 시스템 포함; 통신 준비 안 됨; 범용 통신 준비 완료(스피커 컷아웃); 기타
zh-CN: 头盔通讯系统适配性: 支持特定品牌/型号的通信系统; 包含通信系统; 不支持通信系统; 支持通用通信系统（预留扬声器孔位）; 其他
cs: Připravenost komunikačního systému přilby: Připraveno pro komunikaci specifickou pro značku/model; Včetně komunikačního systému; Není připraveno pro komunikaci; Univerzálně připraveno pro komunikaci (výřezy pro reproduktory); Jiné
zh-TW: 頭盔通訊系統相容性: 特定品牌/型號通訊就緒; 內建通訊系統; 未通訊就緒; 通用通訊就緒 (揚聲器開孔); 其他
ja: ヘルメット通信システムの準備状況: ブランド/モデル専用通信システム対応; 通信システム付属; 通信システム非対応; ユニバーサル通信システム対応 (スピーカー用カットアウトあり); その他
pt-PT: Sistema de comunicação do capacete pronto a usar: Preparado para comunicação (específico da marca/modelo); Sistema de comunicação incluído; Não preparado para comunicação; Preparado para comunicação universal (recortes para altifalantes); Outro
fi: Kypärän viestintäjärjestelmän valmius: Merkki/mallikohtainen viestintävalmius; Viestintäjärjestelmä sisältyy; Ei viestintävalmiutta; Yleinen viestintävalmius (kaiutinaukot); Muu
vi: Khả năng tương thích với hệ thống liên lạc của mũ bảo hiểm: Sẵn sàng kết nối liên lạc theo thương hiệu/mẫu; Đi kèm hệ thống liên lạc; Không sẵn sàng kết nối liên lạc; Sẵn sàng kết nối liên lạc phổ quát (có rãnh loa); Khác
ru: Совместимость шлема с системой связи: Подготовка под связь (специфичная для бренда/модели); Система связи в комплекте; Без подготовки под систему связи; Универсальная подготовка под связь (вырезы под динамики); Другое
de: Kompatibilität mit Helmkommunikationssystemen: Marken-/Modellspezifisch kommunikationsbereit; Kommunikationssystem inklusive; Nicht kommunikationsbereit; Universell kommunikationsbereit (Aussparungen für Lautsprecher); Sonstige
lt-LT: Šalmo paruošimas komunikacijos sistemai: Pritaikyta konkretaus prekės ženklo / modelio ryšio sistemoms; Ryšio sistema pridedama; Nepritaikyta ryšio sistemoms; Pritaikyta universalioms ryšio sistemoms (išpjovos garsiakalbiams); Kita
sv: Kommunikationssystemberedskap för hjälm: Märkes-/modellspecifikt förberedd för kommunikation; Kommunikationssystem ingår; Ej förberedd för kommunikation; Universellt förberedd för kommunikation (högtalarurtag); Övrigt
es: Preparación del sistema de comunicación del casco: Preparado para comunicación específica por marca/modelo; Sistema de comunicación incluido; No preparado para comunicación; Preparado para comunicación universal (recortes para altavoz); Otro
sl-SI: Pripravljenost čelade za komunikacijski sistem: Pripravljeno na komunikacijo za določeno znamko/model; Komunikacijski sistem je priložen; Ni pripravljeno na komunikacijo; Univerzalno pripravljeno na komunikacijo (izrezi za zvočnike); Drugo
nl: Helm communicatiesysteem voorbereiding: Merk-/modelspecifiek communicatiegereed; Communicatiesysteem inbegrepen; Niet communicatiegereed; Universeel communicatiegereed (luidsprekeruitsparingen); Overig
pt-BR: Compatibilidade do capacete com sistemas de comunicação: Pronto para comunicação específico de marca/modelo; Sistema de comunicação incluído; Não está pronto para comunicação; Pronto para comunicação universal (recortes de alto-falante); Outro
da: Forberedt til kommunikationssystem i hjelm: Klar til mærke-/modelspecifik kommunikation; Kommunikationssystem inkluderet; Ikke kommunikationsklar; Universelt kommunikationsklar (højttalerudskæringer); Andet